Washington statutes.
RCW 10.89.060

Duty to send copies to other states.

Upon the passage and approval by the governor of this chapter, it shall be the duty of the secretary of state, or other officer, to certify a copy of this chapter to the executive department of each of the states of the United States.

[ 1943 c 261 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2252-6.]